Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4132.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 68, article 1, section 17, subdivision 17, is amended to read: Subd. 17. Progress Parkway; Eveleth. $6,000,000 in fiscal year 2024 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of transportation for one or more grants to St. Louis County for predesign, design, engineering, environmental analysis and mitigation, land acquisition, construction, and reconstruction of Progress Parkway to provide for intersection improvements and road realignment and extension from marked U.S. Highway 53 and St. Louis County State-Aid Highway 142 to marked Trunk Highway 37 and Station 44 Road in the city of Eveleth. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, deleted text begin 2027deleted text end new text begin 2030new text end .